Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-433
Health care facility; health care service; license; application.

(1) An applicant for an initial or renewal license to operate a health care facility or health care service required to be licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act shall file a written application with the department. The application shall be accompanied by the license fee set pursuant to section 71-434 and shall set forth the full name and address of the facility or service to be licensed, the full name and address of the owner of such facility or service, the names of all persons in control of the facility or service, and additional information as required by the department, including affirmative evidence of the applicant's ability to comply with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act. The application shall include the applicant's social security number if the applicant is an individual. The social security number shall not be public record and may only be used for administrative purposes.

(2) The application shall be signed by (a) the owner, if the applicant is an individual or partnership, (b) two of its members, if the applicant is a limited liability company, (c) two of its officers, if the applicant is a corporation, or (d) the head of the governmental unit having jurisdiction over the facility or service to be licensed, if the applicant is a governmental unit.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 33.